North Carolina, session 2025, HB1110.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Purpose. – The Department of Public Instruction shall establish the
Student Attendance Early Intervention Pilot Program (Program) to implement a data-driven
attendance intervention system in select public schools to reduce chronic absenteeism. The
Program shall prioritize implementation within a single public school unit to ensure fidelity of
implementation, clear accountability, and operational efficiency. The Program shall begin with
the 2026-2027 fiscal year and conclude with the 2027-2028 fiscal year.
SECTION 1.(b) Selection of Schools. – All public school units may apply to
participate in the Program. By September 1, 2026, the Department shall select one public school
unit, and the schools within that public school unit, that will participate in the Program in
accordance with the following:
(1) The Program shall cover no more than 15,000 students combined across all
selected schools.
(2) The schools selected shall demonstrate diversity in student demographics,
including socioeconomic status, geography, and school-level characteristics
sufficient to support a representative pilot.
(3) The Department shall prioritize selecting schools that have a chronic
absenteeism rate above the State average.
(4) The Department shall consider the public school unit's and schools' technical
readiness, staffing capacity, and ability to meet implementation time lines,
including coordination requirements necessary for successful Program
deployment.
*H1110-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) Selection of Vendor. – The Department shall select a vendor to work
with the schools in the Program. The vendor shall offer, within a unified, purpose-built, scalable
platform, a research-proven attendance intervention solution, including tiered evidence-based
workflows, automated bidirectional family engagement, longitudinal documentation of outreach
and supports, and statewide reporting and monitoring across selected schools. The Department
shall select a participating vendor by September 15, 2026.
SECTION 1.(d) Implementation Requirements. – Program implementation shall
align with the technical architecture of the selected solution, including integration with a single
student information system (SIS) in the participating public school unit. The selected public
school unit and schools shall work with the selected vendor to implement the Program beginning
no later than January 1, 2027. To implement the Program, the selected public school unit, schools,
and vendor shall work together to do all of the following:
(1) Designate a local program coordinator.
(2) Implement an attendance system that includes all of the following:
a. Real-time attendance monitoring and early warning indicators.
b. Automated, two-way communication with families, including
multilingual capability.
c. Intervention protocols aligned with a multitiered system of supports
(MTSS), including intervention workflows for at-risk students.
d. Data dashboards for educators and administrators.
e. Documentation and compliance tracking aligned with State attendance
policies.
f. Safeguards for data privacy in compliance with State and federal laws.
(3) Provide training to staff on system usage and intervention strategies.
SECTION 1.(e) Funding. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Public Instruction the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the Student Attendance Early
Intervention Pilot Program, as authorized by this act. The Department may either contract with a
selected vendor to provide services to the selected public school unit or allocate funds to the
selected public school unit for that unit or schools in the unit to contract with the selected vendor.
Funds appropriated by this act shall not revert at the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year but instead
shall remain available until June 30, 2028. The Department and the selected public school unit
may supplement State funds for the Program with eligible federal or philanthropic funding
streams.
SECTION 1.(f) Use of Funds. – Funds appropriated for the Program may be used
for any of the following purposes:
(1) Technology acquisition and licensing.
(2) Implementation and integration services.
(3) Training and professional development.
(4) Program administration and evaluation.
SECTION 1.(g) School Reporting. – Reporting shall be conducted at the public
school unit and school level, and the Department shall aggregate results across participating
schools for evaluation purposes. A single, statewide data instance across multiple student
information systems shall not be required.
SECTION 1.(h) Reporting. – No later than February 1, 2028, the Department shall
report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the following:
(1) Measurable reductions in chronic absenteeism due to the Program.
(2) Improved student engagement and attendance consistency while participating
in the Program.
(3) Operational efficiencies provided by the Program for school staff.
Page 2 House Bill 1110-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Any recommendations on statewide expansion of the Program, long-term
funding strategies, and integrating statewide data systems and longitudinal
data initiatives into the Program.
(5) Any other information the Department feels relevant to evaluating the
effectiveness of the Program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
House Bill 1110-Second Edition Page 3